Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Adoption
199.520.
Judgment — Prerequisites — Orders — Name and legal status of child — Health history and other nonidentifying information of biological parents and relatives to be given to adoptive parents.

After hearing the case, the court shall enter a judgment of adoption, if it finds that the facts stated in the petition were established; that all legal requirements, including jurisdiction, relating to the adoption have been complied with; that the petitioners are of good moral character, of reputable standing in the community and of ability to properly maintain and educate the child; and that the best interest of the child will be promoted by the adoption and that the child is suitable for adoption. In the judgment, the name of the child shall be changed to conform with the prayer of the petition. The judgment and all orders required to be entered and recorded in the order book, including the caption, shall contain only the names of the petitioners and the proposed adopted name of the child, without any reference to its former name or the names of its birth parents.

Upon entry of the judgment of adoption, from and after the date of the filing of the petition, the child shall be deemed the child of petitioners and shall be considered for purposes of inheritance and succession and for all other legal considerations, the natural child of the parents adopting it the same as if born of their bodies. Upon granting an adoption, all legal relationship between the adopted child and the biological parents shall be terminated except the relationship of a biological parent who is the spouse of an adoptive parent.

The clerk of the court shall notify the cabinet of any action of the court with respect to entering a judgment granting an adoption, the amendment of an adoption, or the denial or dismissal of a petition for adoption.

The health history and other nonidentifying background information of biological parents and blood relatives of the adopted person, in writing, on a standardized form, provided by the cabinet, if known, shall be given by the cabinet or child-placing agency which has the information to the adoptive parents and to the Circuit Court not later than the date of finalization of the adoption proceedings. This information shall include the results of any tests for HIV or hepatitis A, B, and C; and
(4) (a)

The health history and other nonidentifying background information of biological parents and blood relatives of the adopted person, in writing, on a standardized form, provided by the cabinet, if known, shall be given by the cabinet or child-placing agency which has the information to the adoptive parents and to the Circuit Court not later than the date of finalization of the adoption proceedings. This information shall include the results of any tests for HIV or hepatitis A, B, and C; and

The information provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection, if known, shall, upon the request in person or in writing of the adult adopted person be made available in writing to that person. The information shall not be made available if it is of a nature that would tend to identify the biological parents of the adopted person except as provided in KRS 199.570 and 199.572.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 15; 1956, ch. 157, § 14; 1974, ch. 121, § 3; 1984, ch. 16, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 43, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 242, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 432, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 166, § 2, effective June 24, 2003.

199.525.
Dissemination of post-adoption information about medical or genetic condition affecting an adopted person.

If the cabinet receives written information from the biological parent or adult biological sibling of an adopted person or a provider of medical services concerning a physician-verified medical or genetic condition which has affected or may affect the physical or mental health of genetically-related persons, the cabinet shall make a diligent effort to notify the adoptive parent if the adopted person is a minor, the adult adopted person, or the adult adoptable person in order to transmit the health information. For the purposes of this section, “adoptable person” means a person for whom the court has terminated the parental rights of both biological parents but who has not been adopted.

The cabinet shall submit the health information to the clerk of the Circuit Court which issued the adoption order, and the clerk shall place the health information in the adoption case file.

If a child-placing agency or the court receives health information, it shall notify and transmit the information to the cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 325, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

199.530.
Judgment of adoption — Name and legal status of adopted child — Inheritance rights. [Repealed.]

199.540.
Annulment of adoption — Period after which adoption not subject to attack.

If a child adopted under KRS 199.470 to 199.520 reveals definite traits of ethnological ancestry different from those of the adoptive parents, and of which the adoptive parents had no knowledge or information prior to the adoption, a petition setting forth the facts may be filed by the original petitioner or the cabinet at any time within five (5) years after the adoption with the court which decreed the adoption. If upon hearing the facts set forth in the petition they are established, the court may enter a decree of annulment of the adoption and setting aside any or all rights or obligations which may have accrued by reason of the adoption.

After the expiration of one (1) year from the date of the entry of judgment of adoption, the validity thereof shall not be subject to attack in any action, collateral or direct, by reason of any irregularity or failure to comply with KRS 199.470 to 199.520, either procedurally or substantively.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 17; 1970, ch. 92, § 66; 1994, ch. 242, § 9, effective July 15, 1994.

199.550.
Disposition of child if adoption not adjudged.

If for any reason whatsoever a petition for adoption of a minor child be dismissed or the judgment of adoption annulled, the following disposition shall be made of the child:

If the child is, or was, prior to the filing of the petition, in the care, custody, and control of the cabinet, individual, institution, or agency, then the child shall be returned to the custody of the cabinet or such individual, institution, or agency;

Otherwise the court shall certify the case to the juvenile session of the District Court of the county where the adoption proceeding is pending for appropriate action and disposition. Said District Court shall advise the cabinet of the pendency of such action.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 18; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 177, effective January 2, 1978.

199.555.
State-funded adoption assistance payments — Conditions.

A “special-needs child” means:

A child which the state has determined cannot or should not be returned to the home of the child’s parents; and

A child which the state has first determined:

That there exists a specific factor or condition the existence of which leads to the reasonable conclusion that the child cannot be placed with adoptive parents without providing adoption assistance under this section or medical assistance under Title XIX; and

That except where it would be against the best interests of the child because of such factors as the existence of significant emotional ties with prospective adoptive parents while in the care of these parents as a foster child, a reasonable, but unsuccessful, effort has been made to place the child with appropriate adoptive parents without providing adoption assistance under this section or medical assistance under Title XIX.

“State-funded adoption assistance” means a monthly payment to assist in meeting the special needs of a child which was placed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. The state-funded adoption assistance shall also include payment of nonrecurring adoption expenses, and may include reimbursement of extraordinary medical expenses.

“Nonrecurring adoption expenses” means those expenses which are incurred in the legal adoption of a special-needs child for which parents are ultimately responsible which include reasonable and necessary adoption fees, court costs, attorney fees, and other expenses which are directly related to the special-needs adoption and which are not incurred in violation of state or federal law.

“Extraordinary medical expenses” means those expenses which are related to the child’s special needs which existed prior to the adoption and are not reimbursed by private insurance, Medicaid, or other third-party payors or government programs.

If the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or his designated representative finds that a child may benefit from being adopted and that a monthly assistance payment to adoptive parents after the adoption will increase the likelihood of adoption, state funds may be paid to the adoptive parents after completion of the adoption of the child if the following conditions exist:

The child was considered a special-needs child prior to the adoption;

The child is committed to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the cabinet has authority to consent to the child’s adoption; and

The adoptive parents can give suitable care to the child if a monthly adoption assistance is paid.

Agreements for the payments of state funds under this section shall be made prior to the adoption of the child. However, if the secretary for health and family services or his designated representative finds that the adoption is likely to disrupt, state-funded extraordinary medical expenses may be reimbursed contingent upon availability of resources, if the following conditions exist:

The child was placed for adoption by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

The child was considered a special-needs child prior to the adoption;

The parents have made a reasonable effort under the circumstances to meet the needs of the child without reimbursement for extraordinary medical expenses.

The payments shall be out of funds appropriated to the cabinet and those funds collected pursuant to KRS 199.473(13), which shall be deposited in a restricted account for the purpose of assisting special-needs adoptions, and shall be in accordance with regulations promulgated by the secretary. The payments shall not exceed the amount which would be paid for foster care for the child. Monthly state-funded assistance payments shall not exceed the amount which would be paid for foster care for the child and may include reimbursement for extraordinary medical expenses. Payment of nonrecurring adoption expenses shall only be reimbursed up to the limit established by the secretary for health and family services in accord with 42 U.S.C. sec. 673. However, payments under agreements entered into under subsection (6) of this section shall be limited to reimbursement of authorized extraordinary medical expenses related to problems or conditions that existed prior to the adoption.

State-funded adoption assistance payments shall not be made to parents if:

The child has attained the age of eighteen (18), except that if the child is enrolled in a state or federal educational program, the payments may continue through age twenty-one (21);

The cabinet determines the parents are no longer legally responsible for the support of the child; or

The cabinet determines that the child is no longer receiving any support from the parents.

Parents who have been receiving state-funded adoption assistance payments under this section shall keep the cabinet informed of circumstances which would, pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, make them ineligible for assistance, or eligible for assistance in a different amount.

The cabinet shall establish criteria to be followed for the adoption of children under provisions of this section and shall promulgate the criteria by administrative regulations.

This subsection shall apply to any child meeting the conditions of this subsection who at the time of application for the state-funded post-adoption extraordinary medical expenses is under the age of eighteen (18). This subsection shall have retroactive as well as prospective effect.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 346, § 1; 1974, ch. 179, § 1; 1986, ch. 467, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 247, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 426, § 143, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 180, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 175, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 48, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

199.557.
Federal Title IV-E adoption assistance.

For the purpose of this section, unless the context requires otherwise, “Federal Title IV-E adoption assistance” means a monthly payment to assist in the integration of the child into the adoptive family and the payment of nonrecurring adoption expenses which include reasonable and necessary adoption fees, court costs, attorney fees, and other expenses which are directly related to legal adoption of a special-needs child and which are not incurred in violation of state or federal law.

Federal Title IV-E adoption assistance shall be paid to the adoptive parent or parents after conclusion of the adoption if the child meets the eligibility criteria established at 42 U.S.C. sec. 673.

Agreements for Federal Title IV-E adoption assistance under this section shall be made prior to the adoption of the child.

Payment shall be out of funds appropriated to the cabinet and Federal Title IV-E funds of the Social Security Act as amended (42 U.S.C. secs. 673 et seq.). All payments shall be in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. Payments shall not exceed the amount which would be paid for foster care for the child. Nonrecurring adoption expenses shall only be reimbursed up to the limit established by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or his designated representative in accordance with 42 U.S.C. secs. 673 et seq.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 247, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 426, § 144, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 181, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 48, § 2, effective July 15, 2008.

199.560.
Appeal.

Any party to any adoption proceeding shall have the same right of appeal to the Court of Appeals of Kentucky as in other equity actions.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 19.

199.565.
Statewide swift adoption procedures — Protocol — Teams — Quarterly report. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 325, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 14, § 19, effective July 14, 2000; repealed by 2018 ch. 159, § 58, effective July 14, 2018.

199.570.
Adoption records confidential — Exception — New birth certificate.

The files and records of the court during adoption proceedings shall not be open to inspection by persons other than parties to the proceedings, their attorneys, and representatives of the cabinet except under order of the court expressly permitting inspection.
(1) (a)

The files and records of the court during adoption proceedings shall not be open to inspection by persons other than parties to the proceedings, their attorneys, and representatives of the cabinet except under order of the court expressly permitting inspection.

Upon the entry of the final order in the case, the clerk shall place all papers and records in the case in a suitable envelope which shall be sealed and shall not be open for inspection by any person except on written order of the court, except that upon the written consent of the biological parents and upon written order of the Circuit Court all papers and records including all files and records of the Circuit Court during proceedings for termination of parental rights provided in KRS 625.108 shall be open for inspection to any adult adopted person who applies in person or in writing to the Circuit Court as provided in KRS 199.572. Health information received pursuant to KRS 199.525 shall be added to the adoption case file. The clerk of the Circuit Court shall set up a separate docket and order book for adoption cases and these files and records shall be kept locked.

No person having charge of any adoption records shall disclose the names of any parties appearing in such records or furnish any copy of any such records to any person or other entity that does not meet the requirements of KRS 199.572, except upon order of the court which entered the judgment of adoption.

After entry of the adoption judgment, the clerk of the Circuit Court shall promptly report to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services of Kentucky full information as called for on forms furnished by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, necessary to make a new birth certificate conforming to the standard birth certificate form. Upon receipt of this information, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall cause to be made a new record of the birth and it shall be filed with the original certificate, and the original certificate shall be stamped with the words, “CONFIDENTIAL — subject to copy and/or inspection only on written order of the court.”

The new certificate shall set forth the new name, if any, of the adopted child, the names of the adoptive parents, and such other information deemed necessary in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in issuing of birth certificates. If the adopted child is under eighteen (18) years of age, the birth certificate shall not contain any information revealing the child is adopted and shall show the adoptive parent or parents as the biological parent or parents of the child. If requested by the adoptive parents, the new birth certificate when issued shall contain the location of birth, hospital, and name of doctor or midwife. This information should be given only by an order of the court in which the child was adopted. The new birth certificate shall recite the residence of the adoptive parents as the birthplace of the child and this shall be deemed for all legal purposes to be the birthplace of the child. If no birth certificate is on file for a child born in Kentucky, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall prepare a certificate of birth in accordance with the information furnished the cabinet by the clerk of the Circuit Court which issued the adoption order. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall furnish to the clerks of the Circuit Courts the necessary forms to carry out the provisions of this section. If the child was born in another state, the order of adoption shall be forwarded to the division of vital statistics of the state concerned to be changed in accordance with the laws of such state. If the child was born in a foreign country, the report of adoption shall be returned to the attorney or agency handling the adoption for submission to the appropriate federal agency.

Thereafter when any copy of the certificate of birth of any child is issued it shall be a copy of the new certificate of birth, except when an order of the court granting the judgment of adoption shall request the issuance of the copy of the original certificate of the child’s birth.

If any judgment of adoption is reversed, modified, or vacated in any particular, the clerk of the Circuit Court shall notify the Cabinet for Health and Family Services of the reversal or modification and the effect of same, and the cabinet shall make any necessary changes in its records.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 20; 1956, ch. 157, § 16; 1968, ch. 69, § 1; 1970, ch. 232, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(4); 1976, ch. 122, § 1; 1986, ch. 43, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 242, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 325, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 145, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 186, § 8, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 148 and 182, effective June 20, 2005.

199.572.
Inspection of adoption records — Limitations.

At the time the biological parents give up the child for adoption, they shall be asked by the cabinet whether they consent to the inspection of the adoption records, to personal contact by the child, or to both when he becomes an adult. If consent is then given, it can later be revoked. If consent is withheld at that time, the biological parents may give consent at any later time. The initial written statement of consent or refusal of consent to inspection of records and personal contact shall be filed with the Circuit Court not later than the date of finalization of the adoption proceedings. When a written consent is on file, the records shall be available to the adult adopted person, upon his request therefor in writing.

When any adult adopted person applies in person or in writing to the Circuit Court for authorization to inspect all papers and records pertaining to the adoption proceedings of that adult adopted person as provided in KRS 199.570(1), and the biological parents have previously refused consent to inspection of records and to personal contact, the court may, if satisfied as to the identity of the adult adopted person, authorize the adult adopted person to inspect the papers and records if written consent is obtained from the biological parents identified on the adult adopted person’s original birth certificate.

The Circuit Court shall, within seven (7) working days of the receipt of the request, direct the secretary of the cabinet to notify each biological parent identified on the adult adopted person’s original birth certificate that the person has applied to the court for information identifying the biological parent. Within six (6) months of receiving the notice of the request of the adult adopted person, the secretary of the cabinet shall make complete and reasonable efforts to notify each biological parent identified on the adult adopted person’s original birth certificate. The secretary may charge a reasonable fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to the adult adopted person for making this search. Every child-caring facility and child-placing agency in the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the secretary in his efforts to notify these biological parents.

If the cabinet utilizes the services of another person or entity to perform a search under subsection (3) of this section, the cabinet shall enter into a formal contract with that person or entity. A person or entity contracted to perform a search shall be licensed under the provisions of KRS Chapter 329A.

The notification of the biological parents shall not be by mail and shall be by personal and confidential contact by the cabinet. The notification shall be done without disclosing the identity of the adult adopted person. The personal and confidential contact with the biological parents shall be evidenced by filing with the Circuit Court an affidavit of notification executed by the person who notified each parent and certifying each parent was given the following information:

The nature of the information requested by the adult adopted person;

The date of the request of the adult adopted person;

The right of the biological parent to file, within sixty (60) days of receipt of the notice, an affidavit with the Circuit Court stating that the adult adopted person shall be authorized to inspect all papers and records pertaining to his adoption proceedings;

The right of the biological parent to file at any time an affidavit authorizing the adult adopted person to inspect all papers and records pertaining to his adoption proceedings; and

The right of a biological parent to file an affidavit with the Circuit Court stating that all papers and records pertaining to the adoption proceedings of the adult adopted person shall not be open for inspection by the adult adopted person.

The adult adopted person shall not be authorized to inspect the papers and records pertaining to his or her adoption proceedings unless those biological parents identified on the original birth certificate agree in writing to that inspection.

If after diligent and reasonable effort, the secretary of the cabinet certifies that both biological parents identified in the original birth certificate are deceased or the secretary is unable to locate said parents, then a judge of the Circuit Court, upon motion of the adult adopted person, may order that all papers and records of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and those of the Circuit Court pertaining to the adoption shall be open for inspection to the adult adopted person. In any case, the court shall order that only identifying information about the biological parents be shared with the adult adopted person.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 43, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 426, § 146, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 186, § 9, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 183, effective June 20, 2005.

199.575.
Procedure whereby adopted person may seek to locate preadoptive sibling.

In situations where a preadoptive brother or sister relationship existed, and one (1) or more of these siblings was then adopted, the following procedures shall be followed on an inquiry by one (1) or more of the siblings to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services seeking information about his brother or sister:

In all cases, an adopted person eighteen (18) years of age or older or a preadoptive sibling eighteen (18) years of age or older of an adopted person may file information concerning himself, his present location, and his known antecedents with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, stating his interest in being reunited with his preadoptive siblings and authorizing the cabinet to release such information to his preadoptive siblings who may make similar inquiry.

In any case in which a person eighteen (18) years of age or older requests information about or expresses a desire in being reunited with a preadoptive sibling, the cabinet shall first determine whether such sibling has made similar inquiry pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. If the sibling has previously authorized release of information about himself, the cabinet shall release the information to the sibling making inquiry.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 365, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 426, § 147, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 184, effective June 20, 2005.

199.580.
Adoption proceedings pending on June 15, 1950. [Repealed.]

199.585.
Recognition of foreign adoptions — Registration in Commonwealth — When KRS 199.470 petition required.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky shall recognize a decree, judgment, or final order of adoption issued by a court or other governmental authority with appropriate jurisdiction in a foreign country when the child to be adopted has been approved for United States citizenship, or as otherwise provided by federal law.

Upon presentation of an original decree, judgment, or final order of adoption issued by a court or other governmental authority with appropriate jurisdiction in a foreign country, the secretary or his or her designee shall issue, within thirty (30) days, a certified notice that the foreign adoption is registered in the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The secretary or his or her designee may require a translated copy if the original decree, judgment, or final order is not in English. The cabinet shall maintain all records and notices of foreign adoptions in a manner similar to other adoption records.

A petition for adoption under KRS 199.470 shall be required for a child born outside the United States without a decree, judgment, or final order of adoption issued by a court or other governmental authority with appropriate jurisdiction in a foreign country, or for any child born outside of the United States who does not qualify for United States citizenship upon entry into the United States.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 68, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 175, § 4, effective June 20, 2005.

199.590.
Prohibited acts and practices in adoption of children — Expenses paid by prospective adoptive parents to be submitted to court.

A person, corporation, or association shall not advertise in any manner that it will receive children for the purpose of adoption. A newspaper published in the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any other publication which is prepared, sold, or distributed in the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall not contain an advertisement which solicits children for adoption or solicits the custody of children.

A person, agency, institution, or intermediary shall not sell or purchase or procure for sale or purchase any child for the purpose of adoption or any other purpose, including termination of parental rights. This section shall not prohibit a child-placing agency from charging a fee for adoption services. This section shall not be construed to prohibit in vitro fertilization. For purposes of this section, “in vitro fertilization” means the process by which an egg is removed from a woman, and fertilized in a receptacle by the sperm of the husband of the woman in whose womb the fertilized egg will thereafter be implanted.

No person, association, or organization, other than the cabinet or a child-placing institution or agency shall place a child or act as intermediary in the placement of a child for adoption or otherwise, except in the home of a stepparent, grandparent, sister, brother, aunt, or uncle, or upon written approval of the secretary. This subsection shall not be construed to limit the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in carrying out its public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act program in accordance with KRS Chapter 205. This section shall not be construed to prohibit private independent adoption or the right to seek legal services relating to a private independent adoption.

A person, agency, institution, or intermediary shall not be a party to a contract or agreement which would compensate a woman for her artificial insemination and subsequent termination of parental rights to a child born as a result of that artificial insemination. A person, agency, institution, or intermediary shall not receive compensation for the facilitation of contracts or agreements as proscribed by this subsection. Contracts or agreements entered into in violation of this subsection shall be void.

A person, organization, group, agency, or any legal entity, except a child-placing agency, shall not accept any fee for bringing the adoptive parents together with the child to be adopted or the biological parents of the child to be adopted. This section shall not interfere with the legitimate practice of law by an attorney.

In every adoption proceeding, the expenses paid, including but not limited to any fees for legal services, placement services, and expenses of the biological parent or parents, by the prospective adoptive parents for any purpose related to the adoption shall be submitted to the court, supported by an affidavit, setting forth in detail a listing of expenses for the court’s approval or modification.
(6) (a)

In every adoption proceeding, the expenses paid, including but not limited to any fees for legal services, placement services, and expenses of the biological parent or parents, by the prospective adoptive parents for any purpose related to the adoption shall be submitted to the court, supported by an affidavit, setting forth in detail a listing of expenses for the court’s approval or modification.

In the event the court modifies the expense request as it relates to legal fees and legal expenses only, the attorney for the adoptive parents shall not have any claim against the adoptive parents for the amount not approved.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 22; 1984, ch. 119, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 52, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 242, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 148, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 185, effective June 20, 2005.